District of Columbia statutes.
38-1011.04

Sources of funding.

(a)

The Mayor shall apply for grants and additional federal funding that may be available as part of the Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C. § 9201 et seq.) (“the Act”), to support the Program and may administer funds pursuant to the Act.

(b)

(1)

To qualify for funding made available pursuant to the Act, agencies, organizations, and other groups that will offer adult technical career training as part of the Program shall be required to create and submit competitive proposals that match current and future employment needs within the District as identified by the Mayor.

(2)

Entities that have been previously certified by the Mayor for adult technical career training and who have an established success rate, as determined by the Mayor, shall be exempt from the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(c)

The Mayor shall apply for grants and additional federal funding that may be available as part of the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006, approved August 12, 2006 (120 Stat. 683; 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq.).

(d)

The Mayor shall apply for additional federal funding that may be available for technical career training in the form of competitive grants under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, approved February 17, 2009 (123 Stat. 115; 26 U.S.C. § 1, note).

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2174, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2174 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2174 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).